test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON N29	
+N29:aebx	Cases ;
+N29:ajfc	Cases ;
+N29:aätc	Cases ;
+N29:avho	Cases ;
+N29:agym	Cases ;
+N29:aqsj	Cases ;
+N29:aååo	Cases ;
+N29:aådv	Cases ;
+N29:aadw	Cases ;
+N29:affr	Cases ;
+N29:aslt	Cases ;
+N29:abxå	Cases ;
+N29:ahgk	Cases ;
+N29:avph	Cases ;
+N29:amzö	Cases ;
+N29:aäto	Cases ;
+N29:apjx	Cases ;
+N29:amqd	Cases ;
+N29:agäk	Cases ;
+N29:aaew	Cases ;
+N29:ayhu	Cases ;
+N29:aljj	Cases ;
+N29:ampx	Cases ;
+N29:aifp	Cases ;
+N29:agär	Cases ;
+N29:auöö	Cases ;
+N29:alkp	Cases ;
+N29:aiyj	Cases ;
+N29:azcz	Cases ;
+N29:adyp	Cases ;
+N29:adbh	Cases ;
+N29:awyz	Cases ;
+N29:asga	Cases ;
+N29:ajfk	Cases ;
+N29:afac	Cases ;
+N29:awpn	Cases ;
+N29:aaxd	Cases ;
+N29:aamg	Cases ;
+N29:aähk	Cases ;
+N29:ayzj	Cases ;
+N29:aihd	Cases ;
+N29:anyf	Cases ;
+N29:aöqq	Cases ;
+N29:atsw	Cases ;
+N29:aeln	Cases ;
+N29:aoka	Cases ;
+N29:aäor	Cases ;
+N29:awvw	Cases ;
+N29:algh	Cases ;
+N29:auij	Cases ;
+N29:alii	Cases ;
+N29:auöv	Cases ;
+N29:arcf	Cases ;
+N29:acwy	Cases ;
+N29:aias	Cases ;
+N29:awhm	Cases ;
+N29:adib	Cases ;
+N29:akfa	Cases ;
+N29:abqu	Cases ;
+N29:aårq	Cases ;
+N29:ardz	Cases ;
+N29:aerl	Cases ;
+N29:acqv	Cases ;
+N29:aöåy	Cases ;
+N29:awep	Cases ;
+N29:agåe	Cases ;
+N29:awbp	Cases ;
+N29:aheu	Cases ;
+N29:abmc	Cases ;
+N29:ahbk	Cases ;
+N29:aijk	Cases ;
+N29:aube	Cases ;
+N29:aeåh	Cases ;
+N29:aztl	Cases ;
+N29:awåv	Cases ;
+N29:abfr	Cases ;
+N29:aaiä	Cases ;
+N29:auxi	Cases ;
+N29:avöd	Cases ;
+N29:ahvo	Cases ;
+N29:azme	Cases ;
+N29:aföu	Cases ;
+N29:avfx	Cases ;
+N29:aöix	Cases ;
+N29:apåq	Cases ;
+N29:aern	Cases ;
+N29:awhl	Cases ;
+N29:aqch	Cases ;
+N29:aäni	Cases ;
+N29:afzu	Cases ;
+N29:aåkq	Cases ;
+N29:aöiw	Cases ;
+N29:akiz	Cases ;
+N29:ackp	Cases ;
+N29:axeq	Cases ;
+N29:anvg	Cases ;
+N29:augr	Cases ;
+N29:axqå	Cases ;
+N29:ayzb	Cases ;


LEXICON N30	
+N4%0:bhzw	Cases ;
+N4%0:brbf	Cases ;
+N4%0:bkwf	Cases ;
+N4%0:bepy	Cases ;
+N4%0:bqnp	Cases ;
+N4%0:bfht	Cases ;
+N4%0:bårg	Cases ;
+N4%0:bxut	Cases ;
+N4%0:bcsa	Cases ;
+N4%0:baao	Cases ;
+N4%0:bdno	Cases ;
+N4%0:beeg	Cases ;
+N4%0:bpdm	Cases ;
+N4%0:bkår	Cases ;
+N4%0:biös	Cases ;
+N4%0:beig	Cases ;
+N4%0:bbei	Cases ;
+N4%0:bbsx	Cases ;
+N4%0:bysl	Cases ;
+N4%0:bmec	Cases ;
+N4%0:boår	Cases ;
+N4%0:brhf	Cases ;
+N4%0:buqs	Cases ;
+N4%0:blgw	Cases ;
+N4%0:bfov	Cases ;
+N4%0:band	Cases ;
+N4%0:bzvy	Cases ;
+N4%0:bäcä	Cases ;
+N4%0:bfmy	Cases ;
+N4%0:btku	Cases ;
+N4%0:blyy	Cases ;
+N4%0:blii	Cases ;
+N4%0:bålg	Cases ;
+N4%0:bxkc	Cases ;
+N4%0:bnvå	Cases ;
+N4%0:byjv	Cases ;
+N4%0:bmsy	Cases ;
+N4%0:butn	Cases ;
+N4%0:boqa	Cases ;
+N4%0:bbxg	Cases ;
+N4%0:bfök	Cases ;
+N4%0:bsåw	Cases ;
+N4%0:blug	Cases ;
+N4%0:bmhs	Cases ;
+N4%0:byif	Cases ;
+N4%0:bfic	Cases ;
+N4%0:bvby	Cases ;
+N4%0:bydv	Cases ;
+N4%0:bues	Cases ;
+N4%0:bulc	Cases ;
+N4%0:beha	Cases ;
+N4%0:bepd	Cases ;
+N4%0:bvox	Cases ;
+N4%0:bwrm	Cases ;
+N4%0:bqcc	Cases ;
+N4%0:bbty	Cases ;
+N4%0:bfrn	Cases ;
+N4%0:bjjö	Cases ;
+N4%0:btzf	Cases ;
+N4%0:bwue	Cases ;
+N4%0:båwä	Cases ;
+N4%0:banp	Cases ;
+N4%0:buds	Cases ;
+N4%0:buåh	Cases ;
+N4%0:böfi	Cases ;
+N4%0:btvl	Cases ;
+N4%0:båöö	Cases ;
+N4%0:bkäa	Cases ;
+N4%0:bbvk	Cases ;
+N4%0:bämi	Cases ;
+N4%0:bwwr	Cases ;
+N4%0:btäw	Cases ;
+N4%0:bmqj	Cases ;
+N4%0:böex	Cases ;
+N4%0:bchs	Cases ;
+N4%0:bdäm	Cases ;
+N4%0:bgsy	Cases ;
+N4%0:båle	Cases ;
+N4%0:bbgf	Cases ;
+N4%0:bwym	Cases ;
+N4%0:bovc	Cases ;
+N4%0:bper	Cases ;
+N4%0:bcöw	Cases ;
+N4%0:blåe	Cases ;
+N4%0:bpsw	Cases ;
+N4%0:bäåå	Cases ;
+N4%0:bwno	Cases ;
+N4%0:bgvc	Cases ;
+N4%0:bevg	Cases ;
+N4%0:bjxl	Cases ;
+N4%0:bihy	Cases ;
+N4%0:blxj	Cases ;
+N4%0:bkcs	Cases ;
+N4%0:biga	Cases ;
+N4%0:bgkp	Cases ;
+N4%0:bådd	Cases ;
+N4%0:bdvw	Cases ;
+N4%0:bfnl	Cases ;
+N4%0:bvbs	Cases ;


LEXICON N31	
+N31:cäxr	Cases ;
+N31:cxth	Cases ;
+N31:czmu	Cases ;
+N31:cgpo	Cases ;
+N31:cppb	Cases ;
+N31:cncd	Cases ;
+N31:ctve	Cases ;
+N31:cbns	Cases ;
+N31:cbrn	Cases ;
+N31:cxdx	Cases ;
+N31:cpjv	Cases ;
+N31:cjic	Cases ;
+N31:coci	Cases ;
+N31:ctlj	Cases ;
+N31:cqoz	Cases ;
+N31:ceeå	Cases ;
+N31:cjec	Cases ;
+N31:cxod	Cases ;
+N31:carå	Cases ;
+N31:cemd	Cases ;
+N31:ctjd	Cases ;
+N31:czlq	Cases ;
+N31:cfmq	Cases ;
+N31:ctnf	Cases ;
+N31:cökw	Cases ;
+N31:crdp	Cases ;
+N31:cjfa	Cases ;
+N31:csce	Cases ;
+N31:cxzv	Cases ;
+N31:cåpc	Cases ;
+N31:cnxc	Cases ;
+N31:copi	Cases ;
+N31:cböy	Cases ;
+N31:chvj	Cases ;
+N31:cmka	Cases ;
+N31:cåjå	Cases ;
+N31:cyvs	Cases ;
+N31:cnza	Cases ;
+N31:coyl	Cases ;
+N31:cavj	Cases ;
+N31:cbml	Cases ;
+N31:cdxd	Cases ;
+N31:cund	Cases ;
+N31:cxbe	Cases ;
+N31:cjrf	Cases ;
+N31:ccnä	Cases ;
+N31:cngw	Cases ;
+N31:cuäc	Cases ;
+N31:cävo	Cases ;
+N31:cxhm	Cases ;
+N31:cxya	Cases ;
+N31:csfq	Cases ;
+N31:cxyg	Cases ;
+N31:cdbf	Cases ;
+N31:cvzx	Cases ;
+N31:ctze	Cases ;
+N31:core	Cases ;
+N31:cxya	Cases ;
+N31:cwmi	Cases ;
+N31:cfdä	Cases ;
+N31:cdfi	Cases ;
+N31:csjv	Cases ;
+N31:cish	Cases ;
+N31:citr	Cases ;
+N31:cstä	Cases ;
+N31:cvdk	Cases ;
+N31:crdg	Cases ;
+N31:cävä	Cases ;
+N31:cwhv	Cases ;
+N31:cbkä	Cases ;
+N31:ctgp	Cases ;
+N31:cöij	Cases ;
+N31:cgwp	Cases ;
+N31:cqåh	Cases ;
+N31:cähm	Cases ;
+N31:cfeb	Cases ;
+N31:cijl	Cases ;
+N31:cvxh	Cases ;
+N31:cerv	Cases ;
+N31:cåyb	Cases ;
+N31:czäz	Cases ;
+N31:cikf	Cases ;
+N31:cnöä	Cases ;
+N31:ciäo	Cases ;
+N31:csjr	Cases ;
+N31:clvu	Cases ;
+N31:cbao	Cases ;
+N31:cvvf	Cases ;
+N31:cnpf	Cases ;
+N31:cgic	Cases ;
+N31:cxgs	Cases ;
+N31:cwrw	Cases ;
+N31:cvaw	Cases ;
+N31:cfuu	Cases ;
+N31:clnn	Cases ;
+N31:cwve	Cases ;
+N31:cxla	Cases ;
+N31:crvö	Cases ;
+N31:cwpb	Cases ;


LEXICON N32	
+N32:dnic	Cases ;
+N32:dueb	Cases ;
+N32:dksi	Cases ;
+N32:dsyä	Cases ;
+N32:djåp	Cases ;
+N32:dolp	Cases ;
+N32:dnbt	Cases ;
+N32:dhik	Cases ;
+N32:dswc	Cases ;
+N32:duis	Cases ;
+N32:dyåj	Cases ;
+N32:dxez	Cases ;
+N32:dzhx	Cases ;
+N32:dpvu	Cases ;
+N32:dqqj	Cases ;
+N32:detå	Cases ;
+N32:dyäi	Cases ;
+N32:djfg	Cases ;
+N32:dpnx	Cases ;
+N32:dbdd	Cases ;
+N32:dhwk	Cases ;
+N32:dnmq	Cases ;
+N32:dxjh	Cases ;
+N32:divw	Cases ;
+N32:drje	Cases ;
+N32:dabz	Cases ;
+N32:dwaw	Cases ;
+N32:djxr	Cases ;
+N32:dadh	Cases ;
+N32:dckb	Cases ;
+N32:drör	Cases ;
+N32:dirb	Cases ;
+N32:dnqa	Cases ;
+N32:dhmf	Cases ;
+N32:ddni	Cases ;
+N32:dkär	Cases ;
+N32:djmå	Cases ;
+N32:dejo	Cases ;
+N32:dsgu	Cases ;
+N32:dicä	Cases ;
+N32:devr	Cases ;
+N32:dödl	Cases ;
+N32:dqlk	Cases ;
+N32:dhkl	Cases ;
+N32:dåds	Cases ;
+N32:dejk	Cases ;
+N32:deöz	Cases ;
+N32:dmei	Cases ;
+N32:dnäf	Cases ;
+N32:dufb	Cases ;
+N32:dzdm	Cases ;
+N32:dkpy	Cases ;
+N32:dkea	Cases ;
+N32:duiå	Cases ;
+N32:dfll	Cases ;
+N32:dyli	Cases ;
+N32:dwjc	Cases ;
+N32:dnbv	Cases ;
+N32:ddiu	Cases ;
+N32:dgöå	Cases ;
+N32:dhbk	Cases ;
+N32:dcbi	Cases ;
+N32:ddkm	Cases ;
+N32:dzöc	Cases ;
+N32:defå	Cases ;
+N32:dboj	Cases ;
+N32:debo	Cases ;
+N32:dplp	Cases ;
+N32:dädy	Cases ;
+N32:dåos	Cases ;
+N32:dsxz	Cases ;
+N32:dkxm	Cases ;
+N32:döup	Cases ;
+N32:docg	Cases ;
+N32:dduf	Cases ;
+N32:dkvf	Cases ;
+N32:dvui	Cases ;
+N32:drrv	Cases ;
+N32:dpms	Cases ;
+N32:dygr	Cases ;
+N32:dzfg	Cases ;
+N32:däee	Cases ;
+N32:debx	Cases ;
+N32:dyvä	Cases ;
+N32:dxpk	Cases ;
+N32:dmry	Cases ;
+N32:döåi	Cases ;
+N32:dbft	Cases ;
+N32:dgän	Cases ;
+N32:dmxd	Cases ;
+N32:dtgl	Cases ;
+N32:dqhå	Cases ;
+N32:dkyk	Cases ;
+N32:dåbr	Cases ;
+N32:dcdb	Cases ;
+N32:dgpn	Cases ;
+N32:duäl	Cases ;
+N32:dhfå	Cases ;
+N32:ddgx	Cases ;

LEXICON Root
ö N29 ;
a N30 ;
b N31 ;
c N32 ;
